Wyoming statutes. Title 35 Public Health and Safety
Article 10. Controlled Substances
See Dover v. State, 664 P.2d 536,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 334

(Wyo. 1983).

Where portion of substance sold, and rest remains in possession, two offenses charged. —

Where the accused sells the same substance he is charged with possessing, clearly the two offenses must be said to have merged. However, where a designated portion of a controlled substance is sold and the rest, or a different controlled substance, remains in the defendant's possession, both offenses of possession with intent to deliver, and delivery, may be charged. State v. Carter, 714 P.2d 1217,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 487

(Wyo. 1986).

Merger of distinct offenses. —

In certain situations the violation of a charged offense separate and distinct from another with respect to statutory definition is necessarily embraced in and merged in the other. Jackson v. State, 522 P.2d 1356,

1974 Wyo. LEXIS 212

(Wyo.), cert. denied, 419 U.S. 1055, 95 S. Ct. 637, 42 L. Ed. 2d 652, 1974 U.S. LEXIS 3665 (U.S. 1974).

Evidence obtained as result of canine sniff. —

The district court erred in suppressing evidence obtained as a result of the “canine sniff” of the respondents' vehicle; the initial stop was lawful and was followed by a minimally intrusive detention of the vehicle and the respondents on a reasonably articulable suspicion premised upon objective facts indicating that the respondents' vehicle contained contraband. State v. Welch, 873 P.2d 601,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 56

(Wyo. 1994), reh'g denied,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 65

(Wyo. May 25, 1994), reh'g denied,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 67

(Wyo. May 25, 1994).

No suppression of drug evidence. —

In defendant's criminal prosecution for possession of marijuana with intent to deliver and possession of more than three ounces of marijuana, the district court properly denied his motion to suppress evidence of a plastic bag containing eight ounces of marijuana seized during the search of his disabled vehicle. Defendant was properly convicted on his conditional pleas to the felony charge of possession of more than three ounces of marijuana and a misdemeanor charge of possession of marijuana. Morgan v. State, 2004 WY 95, 95 P.3d 802,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 121

(Wyo. 2004).

Where an informant told law enforcement officers that he had recently been in defendant's residence and purchased methamphetamine from defendant the night before, exigent circumstances justified the officers'
warrantless entry into the residence to ensure that there was no one inside who might destroy evidence or threaten officer safety; after a two-minute sweep, the officers left the residence and waited outside for the search warrant. Defendant was not entitled to suppress evidence of marijuana, methamphetamine, and psilocybin mushrooms seized during the execution of the warrant; defendant was convicted of felony possession of marijuana with intent to deliver, misdemeanor possession of psilocybin, and misdemeanor possession of methamphetamine in violation of this section.
Miller v. State, 2009 WY 125, 217 P.3d 793,

2009 Wyo. LEXIS 137

(Wyo. 2009).

No abuse of discretion in receiving tape recording

made during sale of cocaine into evidence, nor in permitting jurors to have transcripts of tape recording. Crisp v. State, 944 P.2d 1165,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 124

(Wyo. 1997).

Evidence held sufficient.

— See Simmons v. State, 687 P.2d 255,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 345

(Wyo. 1984); Pisano v. State, 828 P.2d 666,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 39

(Wyo. 1992).

—

Evidence was sufficient to support defendant’s conviction of felony possession of methamphetamine in a liquid form because the evidence established that the Wyoming State Crime Lab tested a pourable liquid obtained from defendant’s water pipe and that pourable liquid tested positive for methamphetamine. Mathewson v. State, 2019 WY 36, 438 P.3d 189,

2019 Wyo. LEXIS 36

(Wyo. 2019).

Evidence supported count of delivery. —

Evidence did not reasonably support the conclusion that defendant was guilty of possession, but not delivery, of a controlled substance. Pearson v. State, 12 P.3d 686,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 213

(Wyo. 2000), reh'g denied,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 222

(Wyo. Nov. 21, 2000), dismissed, 2003 WY 71, 70 P.3d 235,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 87

(Wyo. 2003).

Evidence was sufficient to sustain a conviction for delivering a controlled substance where defendant sold methamphetamine out of an accomplice's motel room with her knowledge, the accomplice negotiated for the informant to buy methamphetamine from defendant at least partially with defendant's knowledge, and defendant delivered to the informant the quantity of methamphetamine agreed to between the informant and the accomplice. In addition, the informant testified that it was defendant who sold her the drugs. Leyo v. State, 2005 WY 92, 116 P.3d 1113,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 109

(Wyo. 2005).

Where police officers responded to a report that the odor of burning marijuana was emanating from an apartment where minors were present, defendant retrieved from her bedroom a wooden box containing a small amount of marijuana and other paraphernalia. The corporal testified that three juveniles admitted that they had smoked marijuana and defendant admitted that she supplied the drugs; the evidence was sufficient to support defendant's conviction for three felony counts of delivery of a controlled substance to a minor in violation of this section.
Anderson v. State, 2009 WY 119, 216 P.3d 1143,

2009 Wyo. LEXIS 130

(Wyo. 2009).

Evidence sufficient to convict. —

Evidence which included the testimony of an undercover agent that defendant had sold and delivered to him controlled substances was sufficient to convict defendant under this section notwithstanding defendant's testimony alleging entrapment. Montez v. State, 527 P.2d 1330,

1974 Wyo. LEXIS 246

(Wyo. 1974).

Where defendant was in his car at the time the pills were found and had been in the vehicle during at least portions of the period in which he contended others may have placed the pills there, the evidence was sufficient to sustain defendant's conviction of possessing a controlled substance. Valerio v. State, 527 P.2d 154,

1974 Wyo. LEXIS 239

(Wyo. 1974).

Evidence that included bookkeeping entries recording the defendant's drug transactions with a witness and the defendant's admission that he had been smoking marijuana at the time of arrest was sufficient to convict the defendant for possession of marijuana. Urrutia v. State, 924 P.2d 965,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 136

(Wyo. 1996).

There was sufficient circumstantial evidence to establish a defendant's intent to deliver marijuana where the state's key witness testified that the defendant told him that he could “get rid of a lot” of drugs for him and that the defendant left the witness's apartment with drugs and returned later with money and no drugs. Urrutia v. State, 924 P.2d 965,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 136

(Wyo. 1996).

Although defendant argued that there was insufficient evidence to sustain his conviction for possession of marijuana with intent to deliver because the State failed to prove beyond a reasonable doubt essential elements of the crime, the appellate court was compelled to conclude that the evidence was sufficient. The foregoing was especially true in light of defendant's admission that he had sold marijuana in the past to supplement his income, and a search of defendant's home revealed the $100 bill an agent had used to purchase marijuana, which was inadvertently returned to the defendant's wife, as well as a box of plastic baggies, weighing scales, a marijuana sifter, and suspected marijuana and methamphetamine. Pacheco v. State, 2004 WY 160, 102 P.3d 887,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 207

(Wyo. 2004).

Defendant was properly convicted of conspiracy to possess methamphetamine with the intent to deliver. The agreement of the conspiracy, to regain possession of the half pound of commercial methamphetamine in an accomplice's bag so that the accomplice could sell the methamphetamine, could be reasonably inferred from the communication between the accomplices and defendant regarding what occurred vis a vis the informant. The defendant's intentional or active participation in the conspiracy could reasonably be inferred from the relationship between the defendant and accomplices, the communication between them regarding what occurred vis a vis the informant, the defendant's role in the ensuing discussions at the defendant's residence and in his vehicle, the particular statements attributed to the defendant during these discussions, and the defendant's conduct at his residence and upon leaving the residence. The requisite intent could reasonably be inferred from the foregoing and additional evidence concerning the accomplice's stated purpose in regaining possession of the methamphetamine, the testimony regarding the significance of the quantity of the methamphetamine involved, and the testimony regarding the manner in which the methamphetamine was packaged. Ekholm v. State, 2004 WY 159, 102 P.3d 201,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 206

(Wyo. 2004).

Evidence was sufficient to sustain defendant's conviction for possession of marijuana because, notwithstanding the fact that the baggy contained “stems and seed,” the evidence clearly established that the baggy also contained marijuana leaf, which fell directly within the definition of “marijuana.” Leyva v. State, 2005 WY 22, 106 P.3d 873,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 24

(Wyo. 2005).

Evidence was sufficient for the jury to have found beyond a reasonable doubt that defendant possessed a controlled substance, because (1) methamphetamine was discovered inches away from defendant after he made several unusual movements with his leg; (2) the baggie containing the methamphetamine was warm to the touch; and (3) defendant was under arrest and was aware he would be taken to jail giving him motive to dispose of the substance. Doherty v. State, 2006 WY 39, 131 P.3d 963,

2006 Wyo. LEXIS 42

(Wyo. 2006).

Evidence was sufficient to convict defendant of three counts of possession with intent to deliver a controlled substance, based on finding defendant had constructive possession of the drugs on the date of the search, as he had a key to the apartment and had unfettered access to the apartment, defendant's friend testified that defendant sent him the key to the apartment so that he could access the apartment, and the friend testified about defendant's behavior shortly after the search and defendant's specific knowledge regarding the variety and location of the drugs in the apartment.
Taylor v. State, 2011 WY 18, 246 P.3d 596,

2011 Wyo. LEXIS 18

(Wyo. 2011).

State met its burden when it proved defendant knowingly or intentionally possessed a controlled substance. A police officer's testimony, along with the formal tests proving the substance to be methamphetamine, supplied sufficient evidence that defendant was in possession of a controlled substance. Daley v. State, 2016 WY 22, 368 P.3d 291,

2016 Wyo. LEXIS 26

(Wyo. 2016).

Evidence was sufficient to support defendant’s conviction of constructively possessing a controlled substance, given that the drugs were found in a backpack that belonged to defendant, who placed it in the vehicle, the owner of the vehicle testified that he never touched the backpack, and the jury was free to reject defendant’s disavowal of any knowledge of the drugs. Lemley v. State, 2016 WY 65, 375 P.3d 760,

2016 Wyo. LEXIS 74

(Wyo. 2016).

Evidence was sufficient to convict defendant of felony possession of methamphetamine as defendant told law enforcement that he ran from them because he had methamphetamine in his pocket; and an agent testified that the methamphetamine weighed 4.36 grams. Childers v. State, 2021 WY 93, 493 P.3d 168,

2021 Wyo. LEXIS 102

(Wyo. 2021).

Evidence was sufficient to support defendant's convictions of possession with intent to deliver and possession of methamphetamine because: (1) a witness testified that defendant loaded a pipe with methamphetamine, hand it to her, and she smoked it; (2) the witness identified an exhibit as a glass pipe that she and defendant had purchased a few weeks before his arrest; (3) another witness testified that the night before defendant's arrest, she helped him put drug paraphernalia in bags and that she and defendant smoked methamphetamine that defendant provided; (4) police officers found a black fanny pack in defendant's residence that contained several bags of U.S. currency, metal tins containing bags of methamphetamine and marijuana, a propane lighter, a glass pipe, and 2.36 grams of methamphetamine; (5) officers found drug paraphernalia in two bags on defendant's residence; and (6) the officers found bags containing methamphetamine and methamphetamine residue in defendant's storage shed.
Bromley v. State, 2007 WY 20, 150 P.3d 1202,

2007 Wyo. LEXIS 20

(Wyo. 2007).

Conviction under Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 35-7-1031(a) for possessing marijuana, as defined by Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 35-7-1002(a)(xiv), with intent to distribute was supported by sufficient circumstantial evidence, including the marijuana stems and seeds, scale, pipes and bongs containing marijuana residue, baggies used to package marijuana, and $ 345 in cash found near his computer desk in his living room; his girlfriend's testimony that she saw him use and sell marijuana; the testimony of the girlfriend's brother that he purchased marijuana from and smoked it with defendant; defendant's admission to a detective that he possessed, used, and sold marijuana; and his testimony that the seeds and stems were what was left after he had finished smoking the pot just before he was arrested.
Shumaker v. State, 2007 WY 143, 167 P.3d 11,

2007 Wyo. LEXIS 155

(Wyo. 2007).

Evidence was sufficient to convict defendant of three counts of possession with intent to deliver a controlled substance because 1) defendant had dominion and control over the drugs as his girlfriend testified that the drugs belonged to him, and that he placed them in the apartment; 2) the girlfriend testified that defendant frequently asked her to give packages of the drugs to people defendant sent to the apartment; 3) defendant had a key to the apartment where the drugs were found and many of defendant's personal items were discovered in the apartment, including clothes, shoes, hats, and his wallet; 4) defendant was aware of the type and location of the drugs in the apartment as defendant's friend testified that, a few days after the search, defendant told him there was methamphetamine in the apartment in the pantry on the top shelf to the right and, when the police searched the apartment, they found methamphetamine in that very spot; 5) the fact that the drugs were concealed in bags and placed in hiding places indicated that defendant knew he was bringing illegal controlled substances into the apartment and needed to conceal them; and 6) defendant had constructive possession of the drugs on the date of the search as he had a key to the apartment since 2007 and had unfettered access to the apartment, defendant's friend testified that defendant sent him the key to the apartment after October 30, 2008, so that he could access the apartment, and the friend testified about defendant's behavior shortly after the search and defendant's specific knowledge regarding the variety and location of the drugs in the apartment.
Taylor v. State, 2011 WY 18, 246 P.3d 596,

2011 Wyo. LEXIS 18

(Wyo. 2011).

Insufficient evidence to convict.

In a prosecution of defendant for felony possession of marijuana, the evidence was insufficient to support a conviction of constructive felony possession. There was no evidence indicating that defendant arranged any of the interactions, took any part in any negotiations, or made any attempt at all to associate himself with or influence the destiny of the marijuana. Regan v. State, 2015 WY 62, 350 P.3d 702,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 70

(Wyo. 2015).

Lay witness testimony regarding defendant's intoxication. —

In a case where defendant asserted a defense of self-induced intoxication
to the offense of unlawful possession with intent to deliver under
this section, the testimony of two bartenders, including their observations
of defendant and specifically that he was not too intoxicated to
be
served alcohol, was helpful to the fact-finder's determination
of
whether defendant had the requisite intent to commit the crime;
thus,
the trial court did not err in admitting their testimony.
Mickelson v. State, 2012 WY 137, 287 P.3d 750,

2012 Wyo. LEXIS 142

(Wyo. 2012).

Evidence insufficient to meet test of possession. —

Absent evidence to show the nature of the contents of an additional eight paper “decks” which defendant had but did not deliver, the charge of possession of a controlled substance with intent to deliver as relates to this material does not meet the test of possession beyond a reasonable doubt. Jackson v. State, 522 P.2d 1356,

1974 Wyo. LEXIS 212

(Wyo.), cert. denied, 419 U.S. 1055, 95 S. Ct. 637, 42 L. Ed. 2d 652, 1974 U.S. LEXIS 3665 (U.S. 1974).

Mere presence of a person in the vehicle belonging to another where the contraband was discovered did not amount to possession nor was it adequate to establish probable cause for believing the crime in question had been or was being committed by that person. Rodarte v. Riverton, 552 P.2d 1245,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 208

(Wyo. 1976).

Sufficient foundation was laid

for admission of plastic evidence bag containing cocaine for prosecution under this section. Jackson v. State, 522 P.2d 1356,

1974 Wyo. LEXIS 212

(Wyo.), cert. denied, 419 U.S. 1055, 95 S. Ct. 637, 42 L. Ed. 2d 652, 1974 U.S. LEXIS 3665 (U.S. 1974).

When cross-examination question on heroin sale not prejudicial. —

A question on cross-examination as to a statement that the defendant had sold heroin did not conclusively create an inference, warranting a mistrial, that defendant was a heroin dealer where the question was based upon a reference “about this incident,” and an instruction given by the court clarified the phrase and explained the foundation upon which the question rested and the reason the question had been asked. Palato v. State, 591 P.2d 891,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 378

(Wyo. 1979).

Judge may poll jurors to determine their intent, nullify verdict on lesser offense. —

There was no error in the trial judge — following instructions on delivering a controlled substance and possession of a controlled substance, and the jury finding the defendant guilty of both offenses — polling the panel and determining its true intent, sentencing the defendant for delivery of a controlled substance and nullifying the jury's verdict on the lesser offense. Johnson v. State, 695 P.2d 638,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 446

(Wyo. 1985), cert. denied, 491 U.S. 908, 109 S. Ct. 3195, 105 L. Ed. 2d 703, 1989 U.S. LEXIS 3045 (U.S. 1989).

Misdemeanor possession a lesser-included offense of felony possession. —

Trial court erred in failing to give lesser-included offense instruction, since jury rationally could have concluded that defendant possessed 0.3 grams or less of methamphetamine, making her guilty of misdemeanor possession, not felony possession, and misdemeanor possession was a lesser-included offense of felony possession. Houghton v. State, 6 P.3d 643,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 128

(Wyo. 2000).

Jury instructions. —

There is no requirement that possession of the controlled substance in question by the defendant must be exclusive, and jury instruction in prosecution for possession was not in error because it failed to contain a requirement of exclusive possession. Valerio v. State, 527 P.2d 154,

1974 Wyo. LEXIS 239

(Wyo. 1974).

A specific intent instruction which permitted the jury to accept without proof that defendants intended to deliver the marijuana because they performed “an act which it is known will produce a particular result, [and] it is from our common experience presumed to have anticipated that result and to have intended it” was erroneous. Stuebgen v. State, 548 P.2d 870,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 181

(Wyo. 1976).

In connection with defendant’s trial for constructive possession of a controlled substance, the trial court did not err in refusing to give defendant’s proposed instruction, as it was unnecessary given that the instructions given by the trial court correctly explained the law to the jury; the proposed instruction did little more than state the commonsense principle that to knowingly possess a controlled substance, you must know you have it and what it is. Lemley v. State, 2016 WY 65, 375 P.3d 760,

2016 Wyo. LEXIS 74

(Wyo. 2016).

Jury instruction regarding definition of marijuana. —

In a prosecution for illegal possession of marijuana, the court's definition of “marijuana” in the jury instructions was sufficient where the evidence presented at trial showed that the baggy contained marijuana leaf and thus fell within the definition of marijuana, and counsel inferred and presented evidence that the baggy contained “seeds and stems” and later argued to the jury that it was illogical for a person to attempt to sell a “bag of seeds and stems.” Leyva v. State, 2005 WY 22, 106 P.3d 873,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 24

(Wyo. 2005).

Prior convictions under earlier statutory version may be used to enhance. —

The legislative intent is clear that prior convictions under the earlier version of subsection (c) of this section may be used to enhance the penalty under its current version. Demeulenaere v. State, 995 P.2d 132,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 11

(Wyo. 2000).

Incarceration justified for defendant selling drugs to youth and not accepting responsibility. —

Where the prosecutor and investigation report recommended incarceration, and there was testimony indicating that defendant had been selling drugs to young people and that he was unwilling to accept responsibility for his acts, the court did not abuse its discretion in sentencing defendant to incarceration. Yates v. State, 723 P.2d 37,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 592

(Wyo. 1986).

In a prosecution for possession of cocaine with intent to deliver, the trial court erred in refusing to give a lesser-included offense instruction on possession of a controlled substance where the trial court was put on notice that a lesser-included offense instruction was being requested; possession of a controlled substance is a lesser-included offense of possession with intent to deliver; and the evidence cited by defendant, if believed, negated the inference of intent to sell. Thomas v. State, 2003 WY 53, 67 P.3d 1199,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 65

(Wyo. 2003).

Charge dismissed with prejudice as discovery sanction. —

Even though district court had the authority, under Wyo. R. Crim. P. 16(d)(2), to dismiss a criminal drug charge against defendant with prejudice for the State's failure to produce a police report containing defendant's statement, it abused its discretion by doing so without conducting the appropriate inquiry to determine whether the sanction was justified. The district court made no findings as to the reasons why the State did not produce the report, it made no findings about the prejudice that would be suffered by defendant if the charge was not dismissed with prejudice, and it did not discuss whether prejudice could be cured by a less severe sanction such as a continuance.
State v. Naple, 2006 WY 125, 143 P.3d 358,

2006 Wyo. LEXIS 128

(Wyo. 2006).

Separate sentences proper. —

Separate sentences for possession and possession with intent to deliver were proper because the evidence presented at trial showed that defendant possessed methamphetamine both for his own use and for delivery to others. The evidence also showed that agents found separate packages of methamphetamine in different quantities in several locations in and around defendant's residence.
Bromley v. State, 2007 WY 20, 150 P.3d 1202,

2007 Wyo. LEXIS 20

(Wyo. 2007).

Motion to dismiss was properly denied. —

Trial court properly denied defendant's motion to dismiss a charge of felony possession of a controlled substance pursuant to the enhancement provisions of Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 35-7-1031(c)(i) because defendant's waiver of the right to counsel in a prior misdemeanor proceeding was knowing and intelligent; the advisements given in the prior proceeding complied with Wyo. R. Crim. P. 11(b).
Craft v. State, 2011 WY 142, 262 P.3d 1253,

2011 Wyo. LEXIS 148

(Wyo. 2011).

Possession of marijuana. —

Because the burden to establish an exception under the Wyoming Controlled Substances Act is on the person claiming the exception, defendant, who claimed to have possessed hemp, which is not a controlled substance, bore the burden of establishing that the substance was hemp, defined as cannabis with a tetrahydrocannabinol (THC) concentration of not more than 0.3 percent. Thus, sufficient evidence supported defendant’s conviction for possession of marijuana without evidence of THC concentration. Roman v. State, 2022 WY 48, 507 P.3d 453,

2022 Wyo. LEXIS 45

(Wyo. 2022).

Applied

in

Janski v. State, 538 P.2d 271,

1975 Wyo. LEXIS 152

(Wyo. 1975);
Jackson v. State, 533 P.2d 1,

1975 Wyo. LEXIS 135

(Wyo. 1975);
Hicklin v. State, 535 P.2d 743,

1975 Wyo. LEXIS 142

, 79 A.L.R.3d 1050 (Wyo. 1975);
Jasch v. State, 563 P.2d 1327,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 247

(Wyo. 1977);
Clenin v. State, 573 P.2d 844,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 258

(Wyo. 1978);
Ehrenborg v. State, 639 P.2d 886,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 287

(Wyo. 1982);
Ostrowski v. State, 665 P.2d 471,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 332

(Wyo. 1983);
Montez v. State, 670 P.2d 694,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 371

(Wyo. 1983);
Tompkins v. State, 705 P.2d 836,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 538

(Wyo. 1985).;
Perry v. State, 927 P.2d 1158,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 163

(Wyo. 1996);
Beintema v. State, 936 P.2d 1221,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 67

(Wyo. 1997);
Meek v. State, 2002 WY 1, 37 P.3d 1279,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 1

(Wyo. 2002);
Rideout v. State, 2005 WY 141,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 167

, 122 P.3d 201 (2005); Allgier v. State, 2015 WY 137,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 154

(Oct. 23, 2015).

Quoted

in

White v. Board of Trustees, 648 P.2d 528,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 361

(Wyo. 1982); Wright v. State, 670 P.2d 1090,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 373

(Wyo. 1983); Chapman v. State, 728 P.2d 631 (Wyo. 1986); Gist v. State, 737 P.2d 336,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 450

(Wyo. 1987); Hennigan v. State, 746 P.2d 360,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 536

(Wyo. 1987); Jandro v. State, 781 P.2d 512,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 212

(Wyo. 1989); Goettl v. State, 842 P.2d 549,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 174

(Wyo. 1992); Gilliam v. State, 890 P.2d 1104,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 27

(Wyo. 1995); Contreras v. State, 7 P.3d 917,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 166

(Wyo. 2000); Pierce v. State, 2007 WY 182, 171 P.3d 525,

2007 Wyo. LEXIS 194

(Nov. 15, 2007); Smallfoot v. State, 2012 WY 39, 272 P.3d 314,

2012 Wyo. LEXIS 41

(Mar. 16, 2012); Majors v. State, 2011 WY 63, 252 P.3d 435,

2011 Wyo. LEXIS 65

(Apr. 13, 2011); Bowlsby v. State, 2013 WY 72, 302 P.3d 913,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 76

(Jun 12, 2013); Bowlsby v. State, 2013 WY 72, 302 P.3d 913,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 76

(Jun 12, 2013); Marshall v. State, 2014 WY 168,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 191

(Dec. 23, 2014).

Stated

in

Dorador v. State, 711 P.2d 417,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 626

(Wyo. 1985); Capshaw v. State, 714 P.2d 349,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 496

(Wyo. 1986); Robinson v. State, 716 P.2d 364,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 515

(Wyo. 1986); Lee v. State, 743 P.2d 296,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 513

(Wyo. 1987).

Cited

in

Escobedo v. State, 580 P.2d 655,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 207

(Wyo. 1978); Roby v. State, 587 P.2d 641,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 251

(Wyo. 1978); Hernandez v. State, 587 P.2d 1094,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 250

(Wyo. 1978); Apodaca v. State, 627 P.2d 1023,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 351

(Wyo. 1981); Siegert v. State, 634 P.2d 323,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 373

(Wyo. 1981); State v. Zespy, 723 P.2d 564,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 600

(Wyo. 1986); Brown v. State, 738 P.2d 1092,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 461

(Wyo. 1987); Burke v. State, 746 P.2d 852,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 550

(Wyo. 1987); Mower v. State, 750 P.2d 679,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 15

(Wyo. 1988); Gist v. State, 766 P.2d 1149,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 178

(Wyo. 1988); Billis v. State, 800 P.2d 401,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 119

(Wyo. 1990); Hudson v. State, 800 P.2d 471,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 172

(Wyo. 1990); Kruzich v. State, 800 P.2d 489,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 112

(Wyo. 1990); Fortner v. State, 843 P.2d 1139,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 177

(Wyo. 1992); Mondello v. State, 843 P.2d 1152,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 192

(Wyo. 1992); Wells v. State, 846 P.2d 589,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 203

(Wyo. 1992); Saldana v. State, 846 P.2d 604,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 26

(Wyo. 1993); Pino v. State, 849 P.2d 716,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 62

(Wyo. 1993); Lobatos v. State, 875 P.2d 716,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 68

(Wyo. 1994); Vargas-Rocha v. State, 891 P.2d 763,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 37

(Wyo. 1995); Nava v. State, 904 P.2d 364,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 192

(Wyo. 1995); Kaldwell v. State, 908 P.2d 987,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 234

(Wyo. 1995); Medrano v. State, 914 P.2d 804,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 51

(Wyo. 1996); Miller v. State, 942 P.2d 1108,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 105

(Wyo. 1997); DCI. Merkison v. State, 996 P.2d 1138,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 24

(Wyo. 2000); Delacruz v. State, 10 P.3d 1131,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 191

(Wyo. 2000); Capshaw v. State, 11 P.3d 905,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 197

(Wyo. 2000); Oler v. United States, 2001 WY 9, 17 P.3d 27,

2001 Wyo. LEXIS 8

(Wyo. 2001); Nixon v. State, 2001 WY 15, 18 P.3d 631,

2001 Wyo. LEXIS 15

(Wyo. 2001); Asch v. State, 2003 WY 18, 62 P.3d 945,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 20

(Wyo. 2003); Dysthe v. State, 2003 WY 20, 63 P.3d 875,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 22

(Wyo. 2003); Meadows v. State, 2003 WY 37, 65 P.3d 33,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 41

(Wyo. 2003); Sweets v. State, 2003 WY 64, 69 P.3d 404,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 81

(Wyo. 2003); Fender v. State, 2003 WY 96, 74 P.3d 1220,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 117

(Wyo. 2003); Brown v. State, 2004 WY 57, 90 P.3d 98,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 69

(2004); Ingersoll v. State, 2004 WY 102, 96 P.3d 1046,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 130

(2004); Campbell v. State, 2004 WY 106, 97 P.3d 781,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 135

(2004); Rice v. State, 2004 WY 130, 100 P.3d 371,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 169

(2004); Valle v. State, 2006 WY 43, 132 P.3d 181,

2006 Wyo. LEXIS 48

(Wyo. Apr. 12, 2006); Peden v. State, 2006 WY 26, 129 P.3d 869,

2006 Wyo. LEXIS 30

(Wyo. Mar. 14, 2006); Hall v. State, 2007 WY 138, 166 P.3d 875,

2007 Wyo. LEXIS 149

(Aug. 28, 2007); Abeyta v. State, 2007 WY 142, 167 P.3d 1,

2007 Wyo. LEXIS 154

(Sept. 5, 2007); Lawrence v. State, 2007 WY 183, 171 P.3d 517,

2007 Wyo. LEXIS 195

(Nov. 15, 2007); Garvin v. State, 2007 WY 190, 172 P.3d 725,

2007 Wyo. LEXIS 202

(Dec. 6, 2007); Dee v. State, 2008 WY 17, 177 P.3d 218,

2008 Wyo. LEXIS 18

(Feb. 13, 2008); Leyva v. State, 2009 WY 149, 220 P.3d 791,

2009 Wyo. LEXIS 167

(Dec. 9, 2009); Granzer v. State, 2010 WY 130, 239 P.3d 640,

2010 Wyo. LEXIS 140

(Sept. 29, 2010); Graham v. State, 2011 WY 39, 247 P.3d 872,

2011 Wyo. LEXIS 41

(Mar. 4, 2011); Washington v. State, 2011 WY 132, 261 P.3d 717,

2011 Wyo. LEXIS 137

(Sept. 20, 2011); Landeroz v. State, 2011 WY 168, 267 P.3d 1075,

2011 Wyo. LEXIS 176

(Dec. 28, 2011); Mebane v. State, 2012 WY 43, 272 P.3d 327,

2012 Wyo. LEXIS 46

(Mar. 21, 2012); Phelps v. State, 2012 WY 87, 278 P.3d 1148,

2012 Wyo. LEXIS 92

(June 19, 2012); Klomliam v. State, 2014 WY 1, 315 P.3d 665,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 1

, 2014 WL 28838 (Jan 3, 2014); Russell v. State, 2013 WY 137, 312 P.3d 76,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 143

, 2013 WL 5859618 (Oct 31, 2013); Russell v. State, 2013 WY 137, 312 P.3d 76,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 143

, 2013 WL 5859618 (Oct 31, 2013); Engdahl v. State, 2014 WY 76,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 82

(Jun 13, 2014); Cardenas v. State, 2014 WY 92,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 1

02

, 2014 WL 3586509 (Jul 22, 2014); Overson v. State, 2017 WY 4, 386 P.3d 1149,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 4

(Wyo. 2017).

Law reviews. —

For note, “Can You Be Busted for Your Roommate's Pot? Mulligan v. State, 513 P.2d 180,

1973 Wyo. LEXIS 175

(Wyo. 1973),” see IX Land & Water L. Rev. 237 (1974).

For case note, “The Entrapment Defense — The Determination of Predisposition. Janski v. State, 538 P.2d 271,

1975 Wyo. LEXIS 152

(Wyo. 1975),” see XI Land & Water L. Rev. 265 (1976).

For comment on Stuebgen v. State, 548 P.2d 870,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 181

(Wyo. 1976), cited in case notes, see XII Land & Water L. Rev. 301 (1977).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Admissibility, in criminal prosecution, of expert opinion allegedly stating whether drugs were possessed with intent to distribute — state cases, 83 ALR4th 629.

Validity, construction and effect of state statute regulating sale of counterfeit or imitation controlled substances, 84 ALR4th 936.

Defense of necessity, duress or coercion in prosecution for violation of state narcotics laws, 1 ALR5th 938.

Minimum quantity of drug required to support claim that defendant is guilty of criminal “possession” of drug under state law, 4 ALR5th 1.

Criminality of act of directing to, or recommending, source from which illicit drugs may be purchased, 34 ALR5th 125.

Sufficiency of random sampling of drug or contraband to establish jurisdictional amount required for conviction, 45 ALR5th 1.

Sufficiency of evidence that possessor of heroin had intent to distribute it, so as to violate
21 USC § 841 (a)(1) , 78 ALR Fed 413.

Sufficiency of evidence that possessor of cocaine had intent to distribute it, so as to violate 21 USC § 841(a)(1), 80 ALR Fed 397.

Sufficiency of evidence that possessor of controlled substance other than cocaine, heroin or marijuana had intent to distribute it, so as to violate 21 USC § 841(a)(1), 80 ALR Fed 507.

Drug abuse: what constitutes illegal constructive possession under 21 USC § 841(a)(1), prohibiting possession of a controlled substance with intent to manufacture, distribute or dispense the same, 87 ALR Fed 309.

Admissibility of expert evidence concerning meaning of narcotics code language in federal prosecution for narcotics dealing—modern cases, 104 ALR Fed 230.

Propriety of instruction of jury on “conscious avoidance” of knowledge of nature of substance or transaction in prosecution for possession or distribution of drugs, 109 ALR Fed 710.

Admissibility, under Rule 404(b) of Federal Rules of Evidence (28 USC Appx., Federal Rules of Evidence, Rule 404(b)), of evidence of accused's prior use of illegal drugs in prosecution for conspiracy to distribute such drugs, 114 ALR Fed 511.